Connecticut, session 2026, SB00366.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 14-108a of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (a) (1) The Commissioner of Transportation shall prescribe for the
5 Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency Services
6 and Public Protection and for each police department and officer and
7 other suitable agencies or individuals a uniform investigation of
8 accident report, in such form as the commissioner shall prescribe, which
9 form shall be followed in filing all such reports.
10 (2) In each motor vehicle accident in which any person is killed or
11 injured or in which damage to the property of any one individual,
12 including the operator, in excess of one thousand dollars is sustained,
13 the police officer, agency or individual who, in the regular course of
SB366 / File No. 279 1

SB366 File No. 279
14 duty, investigates such accident, either at the time of or at the scene of
15 the accident or thereafter, by interviewing the participants or witnesses,
16 shall, (A) not later than five days after completing such investigation,
17 complete and forward one copy of such report to the Commissioner of
18 Transportation, and (B) not later than thirty days after completing such
19 investigation, make such report available to such participants and any
20 such witnesses. Such report shall contain all available information
21 relating to the location and cause of the accident, the conditions then
22 existing, the persons and vehicles involved and the names of the
23 insurance companies issuing their automobile liability policies, as well
24 as the enforcement action taken, if any, and, in the case of a motor
25 vehicle accident in which any person is killed, such report shall, if
26 possible and practicable, reach a conclusion as to the cause of the
27 accident. If such a conclusion cannot be reached, the investigating
28 officer, agency or individual shall refer the case to the state's attorney
29 for the judicial district in which the accident occurred, who may refer
30 the case to the Division of State Police within the Department of
31 Emergency Services and Public Protection for review and further
32 investigation. The Commissioner of Transportation shall forward to the
33 Commissioner of Motor Vehicles one copy of each report of any accident
34 involving a school bus. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may
35 inquire into or investigate any accident reported pursuant to this
36 subsection and may request the assistance of the Division of State Police
37 within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for
38 such purposes.
39 Sec. 2. Section 7-294pp of the general statutes is amended by adding
40 subsection (e) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
41 (NEW) (e) For any matter in which a person experiences an
42 emergency medical condition or is medically unstable while in direct
43 audio or visual contact with, or under the custody or control of, a peace
44 officer, the peace officer shall prepare a report describing the matter. The
45 report shall be completed not later than five days after the matter
46 occurred. Upon request by such person, the peace officer shall provide
47 a copy of the completed report to the person not later than five days
SB366 / File No. 279 2

SB366 File No. 279
48 after the report is completed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-108a(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 7-294pp(e)
PS Joint Favorable
SB366 / File No. 279 3

SB366 File No. 279
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various State Agencies Various - See Below See Below
Potential Cost
Note: Various=Various
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Municipal Police Departments Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Explanation
The bill results in a potential cost to various state agencies1 and
municipal police departments by requiring peace officers to prepare a
report within five days of any matter in which a person has certain
medical emergencies while in the officer's presence, as outlined in the
bill.
The potential cost depends on whether the increased reporting
requirements result in a need for more staff or overtime, which would
depend on the number of covered interactions. Agencies that routinely
interact with or are in the vicinity of clients who experience an
emergency medical condition or are medically unstable may experience
1These agencies include, but are not limited to, the Connecticut State Police, the
University of Connecticut Police Department, the police departments of the
Connecticut State Colleges & Universities, the Department of Mental Health and
Addiction Services Police, and the Environmental Conservation Police in the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection.
SB366 / File No. 279 4

SB366 File No. 279
higher costs. For example, most emergency related client interactions
under the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
(DMHAS) are a response to staff requests for assistance during
medical/psych emergencies. These instances are not formally
documented by police and are handled by clinical staff. To the extent
the reporting requirement applies regardless of whether an immediate
request for emergency services is made, DMHAS would incur increased
staff costs to document, report, and record every incident.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of required reports.
SB366 / File No. 279 5

SB366 File No. 279
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 366
AN ACT CONCERNING THE UNIFORM INVESTIGATION OF
ACCIDENT REPORT AND CERTAIN REPORTS BY PEACE
OFFICERS.